Montana, session 2025, SB475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prohibition on aluminum in vaccines -- enforcement. (1) A vaccine
containing aluminum as an ingredient may not be used or sold within the state. A health care provider, as
defined in 50-4-106, may not administer a vaccine that contains aluminum as an ingredient.
(2) The department of public health and human services may use its authority pursuant to 50-1-
202 to enforce this section.
(3) The department of labor and industry may maintain a licensing action against a health care
provider for a violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Provider notification -- implementation plan. (1) Within 30 days of [the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 475

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 475.1
effective date of this section], the department of public health and human services shall provide notice of
[sections 1 and 2] to each vaccine manufacturer, vaccine distributor, and health care provider in the state.
(2) Within 1 year of [the effective date of this section], a vaccine manufacturer or vaccine
distributor shall submit an implementation plan to the department of public health and human services. The
implementation plan must include:
(a) a reasonable timeline for compliance not to exceed 90 days;
(b) provisions for the removal of vaccines containing aluminum from all retail, pharmacy, and
health care establishments in the state; and
(c) provisions for the distribution of aluminum-free vaccines to pharmacy and health care providers
in the state;
(3) Within 15 days of the date that aluminum-free vaccines become available for human use, the
department of public health and human services shall certify to the code commissioner that aluminum-free
vaccines are available.
(4) Within 30 days of the department of public health and human services certifying the availability
of aluminum-free vaccines, a vaccine manufacturer or vaccine distributor shall proceed with the implementation
plan submitted pursuant to subsection (2).

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as a new part in Title 50, chapter 17, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 17, apply to [sections 1 and 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date and contingent effective date. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2), [this act] is effective on passage and approval.
(2) [Section 1] is effective on the date that the director of the department of public health and
human services certifies to the code commissioner that aluminum-free vaccines are available. The director of
the department of public health and human services shall submit certification within 15 days of the occurrence
of the contingency.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 475